District of Columbia statutes.
2-1581

Youth Development Plan.

The Mayor shall oversee the implementation of District’s Youth Development Plan, which has been designed to:

(1)

Increase the quality of coordination and collaboration among all stakeholders to deliver city-funded youth services;

(2)

Advance the positive youth development philosophy and policy approach;

(3)

Effectively implement youth violence prevention and intervention strategies;

(4)

Provide for consistent and sustained investment in the city’s youth guided by positive youth development; and

(5)

Directly impact upon challenges affecting adolescent youth and disconnected youth.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 1152, 53 DCR 6899
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1152 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1152 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1152 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
Short title: Section of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle N of title I of the act may be cited as the “Youth Development Plan Implementation Strategy Act of 2006”.